Maryland, session 2025, HB0194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xliv) Title 14, Subtitle 49 of this article; [or]
(xlv) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; or
(XLVI) SECTION 14–1328 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1328.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSUMER” MEANS THE PURCHASER, OTHER THAN FOR
PURPOSES OF RESALE, OF CONSUMER GOODS, CONSUMER SERVICES, OR CONSUMER
CREDIT.
(3) “MERCHANT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(4) “RETAIL SALE” MEANS THE SALE OF CONSUMER GOODS BY A
MERCHANT TO A CONSUMER FOR:
(I) THE USE OR CONSUMPTION OF THE CONSUMER GOODS BY
THE CONSUMER; OR
(II) THE BENEFIT OR SATISFACTION THAT THE CONSUMER MAY
DERIVE FROM THE USE OR CONSUMPTION OF THE CONSUMER GOODS BY ANOTHER.

HOUSE BILL 194 3
(B) A CONSUMER MAY REQUEST THAT A MERCHANT PAY OR REFUND THE
FULL AMOUNT OF SHIPPING COSTS THE CONSUMER INCURS TO RETURN AN
INCORRECT ITEM THAT IS DAMAGED, FAULTY, OR SENT IN ERROR THAT THE
CONSUMER RECEIVES FROM THE MERCHANT IN CONNECTION WITH A RETAIL SALE.
(C) A MERCHANT THAT RECEIVES A PAYMENT OR REFUND REQUEST FROM
A CONSUMER UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE THE CONSUMER A PREPAID SHIPPING LABEL AFTER
RECEIVING THE REFUND REQUEST; OR
(2) REFUND REFUND THE CONSUMER’S FULL INCURRED SHIPPING
COSTS TO THE CONSUMER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE REFUND
REQUEST RETURNED ITEM FROM THE CONSUMER IN ITS ORIGINAL CONDITION.
(D) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT § 13–411 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.